District of Columbia statutes.
50-921.53

Use of funds resulting from closure.

(a)

Funds resulting from the closure of a capital project pursuant to § 50-921.52(a) shall be allocated to restore funding to the Vision Zero Pedestrian and Bicycle Safety Fund, established by § 50-921.20, up to an annual level of $1.5 million and then equally among the Local Streets Ward-based capital projects; provided, that funds specific to non-participating costs shall be allocated to the non-participating Highway Trust Fund Support project.

(b)

Funds resulting from the closure of capital projects pursuant to § 50-921.52(b) shall be allocated to the Federal Highway Administration capital projects approved for the current fiscal year as part of that year’s Budget Request Act.

May 21, 2002, D.C. Law 14-137, § 11j [11k]
as added Sept. 20, 2012, D.C. Law 19-168, § 9002, 59 DCR 8025
Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-155, § 8012, 61 DCR 9990
Oct. 22, 2015, D.C. Law 21-36, § 6033(b), 62 DCR 10905

History

The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-168 added this section.
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-155 rewrote (a).
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 21-36 substituted “the Vision Zero Pedestrian and Bicycle Safety Fund, established by § 50-921.20” for “the Pedestrian and Bicycle Safety Enhancement Fund, established by § 1-325.131” in (a).

Effect of Amendments

For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 8012 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-377, July 14, 2014, 61 DCR 7598, 20 STAT 3696).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 8012 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-449, October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, 20 STAT 4188).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 8012 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-566, January 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884, 21 STAT 541).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 6033(b) of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-127, July 27, 2015, 62 DCR 10201).

Emergency Legislation